Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.391

K-20 network—Duty to govern and oversee technical design, implementation, and operation.

(1) The office has the duty to govern and oversee the technical design, implementation, and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use; review and approval of network design; and resolving user/provider disputes.

(2) The office has the following powers and duties:

(a) In cooperation with the educational sectors and other interested parties, to establish goals and measurable objectives for the network;

(b) To ensure that the goals and measurable objectives of the network are the basis for any decisions or recommendations regarding the technical development and operation of the network;

(c) To adopt, modify, and implement policies to facilitate network development, operation, and expansion. Such policies may include but need not be limited to the following issues: Quality of educational services; access to the network by recognized organizations and accredited institutions that deliver educational programming, including public libraries; prioritization of programming within limited resources; prioritization of access to the system and the sharing of technological advances; network security; identification and evaluation of emerging technologies for delivery of educational programs; future expansion or redirection of the system; network fee structures; and costs for the development and operation of the network;

(d) To prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature a coordinated budget for network development, operation, and expansion. The budget shall include the recommendations of the director of Washington technology solutions on (i) any state funding requested for network transport and equipment, distance education facilities and hardware or software specific to the use of the network, and proposed new network end sites, (ii) annual copayments to be charged to public educational sector institutions and other public entities connected to the network, and (iii) charges to nongovernmental entities connected to the network;

(e) To adopt and monitor the implementation of a methodology to evaluate the effectiveness of the network in achieving the educational goals and measurable objectives;

(f) To establish by rule acceptable use policies governing user eligibility for participation in the K-20 network, acceptable uses of network resources, and procedures for enforcement of such policies. The office shall set forth appropriate procedures for enforcement of acceptable use policies, that may include suspension of network connections and removal of shared equipment for violations of network conditions or policies. The office shall have sole responsibility for the implementation of enforcement procedures relating to technical conditions of use.

[ 2024 c 54 s 41; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 214; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 718. Formerly RCW 43.41A.085.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.